Mississippi statutes. Title 45. Public Safety and Good Order
Docket of Deadly Weapons Seized

§ 45-9-151.
Docket of deadly weapons seized.

Every law enforcement agency of the state or of any political subdivision thereof shall maintain a docket which shall contain a record of all deadly weapons that are seized by employees of such law enforcement agency. Such docket shall include the name of the arresting officer, the date of the arrest, the charge upon which the seizure was based, the name of the person from whom such deadly weapon was seized, the physical description of the deadly weapon, the serial number, if any, of the deadly weapon, and the chain of custody of the deadly weapon.

Every deadly weapon seized by any law enforcement officer shall be entered into the docket required to be maintained pursuant to subsection (1) of this section within ten (10) days after the occurrence of such seizure.

If the court orders any seized deadly weapon to be forfeited and disposed of by sale, the proceeds of such sale shall be deposited into the general fund of the governmental entity of which such law enforcement agency is a part and shall be budgeted to such law enforcement agency. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to deadly weapons that are subject to forfeiture pursuant to Section 41-29-153, Mississippi Code of 1972.

Any law enforcement officer who knowingly fails to cause a seized deadly weapon to be entered into the docket within the time limit specified in subsection (2) of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, may be fined not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00). A conviction under the provisions of this section shall not be used as the basis for removal of a person from elective office.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 609, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1991.